North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15.1 Elementary and Secondary Education
CHAPTER 15.1-10 County Committee

15.1-10-01.
County committee — Appointment — Compensation.

The county superintendent of schools, with the approval of the board of county commissioners, shall appoint residents, equal in number to the board of county commissioners, to serve as a county committee for purposes of school district annexations, dissolutions, and reorganizations.

The term of office for county committee members is three years, staggered so that one term expires each year.

If a vacancy occurs, the county superintendent, with the approval of the board of county commissioners, shall appoint an individual to serve for the unexpired portion of the term. If a county committee member fails, refuses, or is unable to perform the required duties, the county superintendent, upon being petitioned by a majority of the school board presidents representing districts having territory wholly or partially within the county, shall declare the position of the member vacant and shall appoint a new member to the committee.

Each member is entitled to compensation at the rate of sixty-two dollars and fifty cents per day and to reimbursement for expenses from the biennial appropriation for the superintendent of public instruction, as provided by law for state officers, if they are attending committee meetings or performing duties directed by the committee.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 10.

Cross-References.

County officers, expense allowances, see N.D.C.C. §

11-10-15.

Expense allowances for public officers generally, see N.D.C.C. §§

44-08-03 to

44-08-04.2,

44-08-05.1.

State officers, expense allowances, N.D.C.C. §

54-06-09.

15.1-10-02.
County committee — Chairman — Meetings.

The members of the county committee shall elect one member to serve as chairman for one year and until a successor is chosen. Meetings of the committee must be held upon the call of the chairman or a majority of the committee members.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 10.

15.1-10-03.
County committee — Secretary.

The county superintendent of schools is the secretary of the committee but may not vote. The county superintendent is entitled to compensation from the employing county for actual and necessary expenses incurred while in the performance of required duties.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 10.

15.1-10-04.
State’s attorney to represent committee.

Each county’s state’s attorney shall serve as legal counsel to the county committee. The state’s attorney shall defend the committee and any of its officers in legal proceedings relating to the conduct or business of the committee. If providing this defense would cause a conflict with the other duties of the state’s attorney, the board of county commissioners, at county expense, shall employ a special counsel to represent the committee in the proceedings.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 10.